Washington statutes.
RCW 18.420.090

Application of uniform disciplinary act.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1427-S2.SL) ***

The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs uncertified practice of peer support services, the issuance and denial of certificates, and the discipline of certified peer specialists and certified peer specialist trainees under this chapter.

[ 2023 c 469 s 12.]